Arkansas, session 2025, HB1967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-26-314 is amended to read as follows:
5-26-314. Unlawful distribution of sexual images or recordings an
intimate image.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Identifiable" means recognizable as a specific person by:
(A) The person's face, likeness, or other distinguishing
characteristic; or
(B) Any additional information that states the identity or
purported identity of the person; and
(2) "Intimate image" means an image, picture, or video that
depicts a person:
(A) In a state of nudity; or
(B) Engaging in sexual contact, sexual intercourse,
deviate sexual activity, or sexually explicit conduct.
(b) A person commits the offense of unlawful distribution of sexual
images or recordings an intimate image if, being eighteen (18) years of age
*CEB064*
04-09-2025 10:41:28 CEB064

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1967
or older, with the purpose to harass, frighten, intimidate, threaten, or
abuse another person, the actor distributes an image, picture, video, or
voice or audio recording of the other person to a third person by any means
if the image, picture, video, or voice or audio recording:
(1) Is of a sexual nature or depicts the other person in a state
of nudity; and
(2) The other person is a family or household member of the
actor or another person with whom the actor is in a current or former dating
relationship he or she purposely distributes an intimate image of an
identifiable person without the consent of the identifiable person depicted
in the intimate image.
(b)(c) The fact It is not a defense to prosecution under this section
that an intimate image, picture, video, or voice or audio recording:
(1) was Was created with the knowledge or consent of the other
identifiable person depicted in the intimate image;
(2) Was created by the identifiable person depicted in the
intimate image;
(3) Was disclosed by the identifiable person depicted in the
intimate image to another person; or
(4) or that the image, picture, video, or voice or audio
recording is Is the property of a person charged under this section is not a
defense to prosecution under this section.
(c)(d) Unlawful distribution of sexual images or recordings an
intimate image is a:
(1) Class C felony for a:
(A) Second or subsequent offense under subdivision
(d)(2)(A) or subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section; or
(B) Third or subsequent offense under subdivision (d)(3)
of this section;
(2) Class D felony:
(A) If the person had a purpose to cause physical injury
or mental, economic, or reputational harm to the identifiable person depicted
in the intimate image;
(B) If the person received anything of value in return for
the commission of the offense; or
(C) For a second offense under subdivision (d)(3) of this
04-09-2025 10:41:28 CEB064

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1967
section; or
(3) Class A misdemeanor if otherwise committed.
(d)(1)(e)(1) Upon the pretrial release of a person charged under this
section, the court shall enter an order consistent with Rules 9.3 and 9.4 of
the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure and shall give notice to the person
charged under this section of the penalties contained in Rule 9.5 of the
Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(2) An order under subdivision (d)(1)(e)(1) of this section
remains in effect during the pendency of any appeal of a conviction under
this section.
(f) This section does not apply to the provider of a
telecommunications service or an information service, as those terms are
defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153, for content provided by another person.

/s/K. Brown





















04-09-2025 10:41:28 CEB064